Rhode Island, session 2025, SB872.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-63.1-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-63.1 entitled "Tourism
and Development" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-63.1-3. Distribution of tax.
(a) For returns and tax payments received on or before December 31, 2015, except as
provided in § 42-63.1-12, the proceeds of the hotel tax, excluding the portion of the hotel tax
collected from residential units offered for tourist or transient use through a hosting platform, shall
be distributed as follows by the division of taxation and the city of Newport:
(1) Forty-seven percent (47%) of the tax generated by the hotels in the district, except as
otherwise provided in this chapter, shall be given to the regional tourism district wherein the hotel
is located; provided, however, that from the tax generated by the hotels in the city of Warwick,
thirty-one percent (31%) of the tax shall be given to the Warwick regional tourism district
established in § 42-63.1-5(a)(5) and sixteen percent (16%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater
Providence-Warwick Convention and Visitors’ Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11; and provided
further, that from the tax generated by the hotels in the city of Providence, sixteen percent (16%)
of that tax shall be given to the Greater Providence-Warwick Convention and Visitors’ Bureau
established by § 42-63.1-11, and thirty-one percent (31%) of that tax shall be given to the
Convention Authority of the city of Providence established pursuant to the provisions of chapter
84 of the public laws of January, 1980; provided, however, that the receipts attributable to the

district as defined in § 42-63.1-5(a)(7) shall be deposited as general revenues, and that the receipts
attributable to the district as defined in § 42-63.1-5(a)(8) shall be given to the Rhode Island
commerce corporation as established in chapter 64 of this title.
(2) Twenty-five percent (25%) of the hotel tax shall be given to the city or town where the
hotel that generated the tax is physically located, to be used for whatever purpose the city or town
decides.
(3) Twenty-one percent (21%) of the hotel tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce
corporation established in chapter 64 of this title, and seven percent (7%) to the Greater Providence-
Warwick Convention and Visitors’ Bureau.
(b) For returns and tax payments received after December 31, 2015, except as provided in
§ 42-63.1-12, the proceeds of the hotel tax, excluding the portion of the hotel tax collected from
residential units offered for tourist or transient use through a hosting platform, shall be distributed
as follows by the division of taxation and the city of Newport:
(1) For the tax generated by the hotels in the Aquidneck Island district, as defined in § 42-
63.1-5, forty-two percent (42%) of the tax shall be given to the Aquidneck Island district, twenty-
five percent (25%) of the tax shall be given to the city or town where the hotel that generated the
tax is physically located, five percent (5%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater Providence-
Warwick Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and twenty-eight percent
(28%) thirty-three percent (33%) of the tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce
corporation established in chapter 64 of this title.
(2) For the tax generated by the hotels in the Providence district as defined in § 42-63.1-5,
twenty eight percent (28%) of the tax shall be given to the Providence district, twenty-five percent
(25%) of the tax shall be given to the city or town where the hotel that generated the tax is physically
located, twenty-three percent (23%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater Providence-Warwick
Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and twenty-four percent (24%) of the
tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce corporation established in chapter 64 of this title.
(3) For the tax generated by the hotels in the Warwick district as defined in § 42-63.1-5,
twenty-eight percent (28%) of the tax shall be given to the Warwick District, twenty-five percent
(25%) of the tax shall be given to the city or town where the hotel that generated the tax is physically
located, twenty-three percent (23%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater Providence-Warwick
Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and twenty-four percent (24%) of the
tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce corporation established in chapter 64 of this title.
(4) For the tax generated by the hotels in the Statewide district, as defined in § 42-63.1-5,
twenty-five percent (25%) of the tax shall be given to the city or town where the hotel that generated
LC002559 - Page 2 of 7

the tax is physically located, five percent (5%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater Providence-
Warwick Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and seventy percent (70%)
seventy-five percent (75%) of the tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce corporation
established in chapter 64 of this title.
(5) With respect to the tax generated by hotels in districts other than those set forth in
subsections (b)(1) through (b)(4) of this section, forty-two percent (42%) of the tax shall be given
to the regional tourism district, as defined in § 42-63.1-5, wherein the hotel is located, twenty-five
percent (25%) of the tax shall be given to the city or town where the hotel that generated the tax is
physically located, five percent (5%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater Providence-Warwick
Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and twenty-eight percent (28%) thirty-
three percent (33%) of the tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce corporation established
in chapter 64 of this title.
(c) For returns and tax payments received before July 1, 2019, the proceeds of the hotel tax
collected from residential units offered for tourist or transient use through a hosting platform shall
be distributed as follows by the division of taxation and the city of Newport: twenty-five percent
(25%) of the tax shall be given to the city or town where the residential unit that generated the tax
is physically located, and seventy-five percent (75%) of the tax shall be given to the Rhode Island
commerce corporation established in chapter 64 of this title.
(d) The Rhode Island commerce corporation shall be required in each fiscal year to spend
on the promotion and marketing of Rhode Island as a destination for tourists or businesses an
amount of money of no less than the total proceeds of the hotel tax it receives pursuant to this
chapter for the fiscal year.
(e) Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, for returns and tax payments
received on or after July 1, 2016, and on or before June 30, 2017, except as provided in § 42-63.1-
12, the proceeds of the hotel tax, excluding the portion of the hotel tax collected from residential
units offered for tourist or transient use through a hosting platform, shall be distributed in
accordance with the distribution percentages established in subsections (a)(1) through (a)(3) of this
section by the division of taxation and the city of Newport.
(f) For returns and tax payments received on or after July 1, 2018, except as provided in §
42-63.1-12, the proceeds of the hotel tax, excluding the portion of the hotel tax collected from
residential units offered for tourist or transient use through a hosting platform, shall be distributed
as follows by the division of taxation and the city of Newport:
(1) For the tax generated by the hotels in the Aquidneck Island district, as defined in § 42-
63.1-5, forty-five percent (45%) of the tax shall be given to the Aquidneck Island district, twenty-
LC002559 - Page 3 of 7

five percent (25%) of the tax shall be given to the city or town where the hotel that generated the
tax is physically located, five percent (5%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater Providence-
Warwick Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and twenty-five percent
(25%) thirty percent (30%) of the tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce corporation
established in chapter 64 of this title.
(2) For the tax generated by the hotels in the Providence district as defined in § 42-63.1-5,
thirty percent (30%) of the tax shall be given to the Providence district, twenty-five percent (25%)
of the tax shall be given to the city or town where the hotel that generated the tax is physically
located, twenty-four percent (24%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater Providence-Warwick
Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and twenty-one percent (21%) of the
tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce corporation established in chapter 64 of this title.
(3) For the tax generated by the hotels in the Warwick district as defined in § 42-63.1-5,
thirty percent (30%) of the tax shall be given to the Warwick District, twenty-five percent (25%)
of the tax shall be given to the city or town where the hotel that generated the tax is physically
located, twenty-four percent (24%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater Providence-Warwick
Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and twenty-one percent (21%) of the
tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce corporation established in chapter 64 of this title.
(4) For the tax generated by the hotels in the Statewide district, as defined in § 42-63.1-5,
twenty-five percent (25%) of the tax shall be given to the city or town where the hotel that generated
the tax is physically located, five percent (5%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater Providence-
Warwick Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and seventy percent (70%)
seventy-five percent (75%) of the tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce corporation
established in chapter 64 of this title.
(5) With respect to the tax generated by hotels in districts other than those set forth in
subsections (f)(1) through (f)(4) of this section, forty-five percent (45%) of the tax shall be given
to the regional tourism district, as defined in § 42-63.1-5, wherein the hotel is located, twenty-five
percent (25%) of the tax shall be given to the city or town where the hotel that generated the tax is
physically located, five percent (5%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater Providence-Warwick
Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and twenty-five percent (25%) thirty
percent (30%) of the tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce corporation established in
chapter 64 of this title.
(g) For returns and tax payments received on or after July 1, 2019, except as provided in §
42-63.1-12, the proceeds of the hotel tax, including the portion of the hotel tax collected from
residential units offered for tourist or transient use through a hosting platform, shall be distributed
LC002559 - Page 4 of 7

as follows by the division of taxation and the city of Newport:
(1) For the tax generated in the Aquidneck Island district, as defined in § 42-63.1-5, forty-
five percent (45%) of the tax shall be given to the Aquidneck Island district, twenty-five percent
(25%) of the tax shall be given to the city or town where the hotel or residential unit that generated
the tax is physically located, five percent (5%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater Providence-
Warwick Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and twenty-five percent
(25%) thirty percent (30%) of the tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce corporation
established in chapter 64 of this title.
(2) For the tax generated in the Providence district as defined in § 42-63.1-5, thirty percent
(30%) of the tax shall be given to the Providence district, twenty-five percent (25%) of the tax shall
be given to the city or town where the hotel or residential unit that generated the tax is physically
located, twenty-four percent (24%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater Providence-Warwick
Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and twenty-one percent (21%) of the
tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce corporation established in chapter 64 of this title.
(3) For the tax generated in the Warwick district as defined in § 42-63.1-5, thirty percent
(30%) of the tax shall be given to the Warwick District, twenty-five percent (25%) of the tax shall
be given to the city or town where the hotel or residential unit that generated the tax is physically
located, twenty-four percent (24%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater Providence-Warwick
Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and twenty-one percent (21%) of the
tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce corporation established in chapter 64 of this title.
(4) For the tax generated in the Statewide district, as defined in § 42-63.1-5, twenty-five
percent (25%) of the tax shall be given to the city or town where the hotel or residential unit that
generated the tax is physically located, five percent (5%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater
Providence-Warwick Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and seventy
percent (70%) seventy-five percent (75%) of the tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce
corporation established in chapter 64 of this title.
(5) With respect to the tax generated in districts other than those set forth in subsections
(g)(1) through (g)(4) of this section, forty-five percent (45%) of the tax shall be given to the regional
tourism district, as defined in § 42-63.1-5, wherein the hotel or residential unit is located, twenty-
five percent (25%) of the tax shall be given to the city or town where the hotel or residential unit
that generated the tax is physically located, five percent (5%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater
Providence-Warwick Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and twenty-five
percent (25%) thirty percent (30%) of the tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce
corporation established in chapter 64 of this title.
LC002559 - Page 5 of 7

(6) For returns and tax payments received on or after July 1, 2025, except as provided in §
42-63.1-12(d), five percent (5%) of the taxes generated in the Aquidneck Island district statewide
tourism district (New Shoreham, South County, Blackstone Valley) shall be given to the Rhode
Island commerce corporation for tourism development, public art and events throughout the
participating regions.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002559
========
LC002559 - Page 6 of 7